Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.222

Dividends on preferred stock.

A converted mutual savings bank may pay dividends on preferred stock at the rate or rates agreed in connection with the issuance of preferred stock if such issuance has been approved by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 365; 1985 c 56 s 24.]